Maryland, session 2026, SB0639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
5–1501.
(b) There is a Small, Minority, and Women–Owned Businesses Account under the
authority of the Department.
(c) (1) The Account shall receive money as required under [§ 9–1A–27] §§
9–1A–27 AND 9–1E–12 of the State Government Article.
Article – State Government
9–1A–28.
(a) There is a Purse Dedication Account under the authority of the State Racing
Commission.
(b) (1) The Account shall receive money as required under § 9–1A–27 of this
subtitle AND § 9–1E–12 OF THIS TITLE.
9–1E–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01 of this title.
(d) “Horse racing licensee” means the holder of a license issued by the State
Racing Commission under § 11–510 of the Business Regulation Article.
(h) “Proceeds” means the amount of money wagered on a sporting event, less:
(1) the amount returned to successful bettors;

SENATE BILL 639 3
(2) the cash equivalents of any merchandise or thing of value awarded as
a prize to successful bettors;
(3) free bets and promotional credits redeemed by bettors; and
(4) all excise taxes paid by a sports wagering licensee in accordance with
federal law.
(i) (1) “Sporting event” means:
(i) a professional sports or athletic event;
(ii) a collegiate sports or athletic event;
(iii) an Olympic or international sports or athletic event;
(iv) an electronic sports or video game competition in which each
participant is at least 18 years old;
(v) a motor race event sanctioned by a motor racing governing entity;
(vi) except as otherwise prohibited under Title 11 of the Business
Regulation Article or the federal Interstate Horse Racing Act, a LIVE horse race, held in or
out of the State, if consented to and approved by:
1. the horse racing licensee of the applicable breed;
2. the organization representing the majority of the owners
and trainers of the applicable breed in the State;
3. the organization representing the majority of the
applicable breeders in the State; and
4. the State Racing Commission;
(VII) A HISTORICAL HORSE RACE;
[(vii)] (VIII) any portion of a sporting event, including the individual
performance statistics of athletes or competitors in a sporting event; or
[(viii)] (IX) an award event or competition of national or international
prominence if expressly authorized by the Commission.
(2) “Sporting event” does not include:
(i) a high school sports or athletic event; or

SENATE BILL 639
(ii) a fantasy competition regulated under Subtitle 1D of this title.
(j) “Sports wagering” means the business of accepting wagers on any sporting
event by any system or method of wagering, including single–game bets, teaser bets,
parlays, over–under, moneyline, pools, exchange wagering, in–game wagering, in–play
bets, proposition bets, and straight bets.
(k) (1) “Sports wagering facility licensee” means a sports wagering licensee
who is authorized to conduct and operate sports wagering at the sports wagering facility
owned, leased, or occupied by the sports wagering licensee.
(2) “Sports wagering facility licensee” includes the holder of a Class A–1,
A–2, B–1, or B–2 sports wagering facility license issued under § 9–1E–06 of this subtitle.
(l) “Sports wagering license” means a license issued by the Commission under
this subtitle that authorizes the holder to accept wagers on sporting events.
(m) “Sports wagering licensee” means the holder of a sports wagering license.
(n) “Video lottery facility” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01 of this title.
(p) “Video lottery operator” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01 of this title.
9–1E–06.
(a) (1) On an award of a license by the Sports Wagering Application Review
Commission established under § 9–1E–15 of this subtitle, the Commission shall:
(i) issue a Class A–1 sports wagering facility license to an applicant
that meets the requirements for licensure under this subtitle who is:
1. a video lottery operator with more than 1,000 video lottery
terminals; or
(ii) issue a Class A–2 sports wagering facility license to an applicant
that meets the requirements for licensure under this subtitle who is:
1. a video lottery operator with 1,000 or fewer video lottery
terminals; or
2. a horse racing licensee;
(iii) subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, issue a Class
B–1 sports wagering facility license to any applicant who meets the requirements for
licensure under this subtitle and who is not eligible for a Class B–2 sports wagering facility
license;

SENATE BILL 639 5
(iv) subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, issue a Class
B–2 sports wagering facility license to any applicant who is a person with less than:
1. 25 full–time equivalent employees; or
2. $3,000,000 in annual gross receipts; and
(v) issue not more than 60 mobile sports wagering licenses to any
applicant who meets the requirements for licensure under this subtitle.
(2) (i) The Commission shall issue a Class B–1 or Class B–2 sports
wagering facility license to an applicant that meets the requirements for licensure under
this subtitle who is:
1. the holder of a license issued by the State Racing
Commission under § 11–524 of the Business Regulation Article, including a subsidiary of
the license holder;
2. a person who is the owner or lessee of a facility approved
for satellite simulcast betting before January 1, 2021, unless the satellite simulcast facility
is located at a video lottery facility or a racetrack; and
3. a person who holds a commercial bingo license, if the
facility at which the person operates commercial bingo was permitted to operate at least
200 electronic bingo machines or electronic tip jar machines on January 1, 2021.
(ii) In addition to the Class B–1 and B–2 sports wagering facility
licenses issued in accordance with subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Commission may
issue not more than 30 Class B–1 and Class B–2 sports wagering facility licenses under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
9–1E–09.
(a) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, A sports
wagering facility licensee may accept wagers on sporting events that are made:
(1) by an individual physically present:
(i) at a video lottery facility, if the sports wagering licensee is a video
lottery operator;
(ii) at Pimlico Race Course or a race track located at Laurel Park, if
the sports wagering licensee is a horse racing licensee;
(iii) subject to subsection (d) of this section, at a stadium primarily
used for professional football (NFL), professional major league baseball, professional
hockey (NHL), professional basketball (NBA), or professional soccer (MLS), if the sports

SENATE BILL 639
wagering licensee is the owner or a lessee or the designee of the owner or lessee of the
stadium;
(iv) at the Maryland State Fairgrounds in Timonium, if the sports
wagering licensee is the holder of a license issued by the State Racing Commission under §
11–524 of the Business Regulation Article, or a subsidiary of the license holder;
(v) at a satellite simulcast facility, if the sports wagering licensee is
the owner or lessee of a satellite simulcast facility described under § 9–1E–06(a)(2) of this
subtitle;
(vi) at a commercial bingo facility with at least 200 electronic bingo
machines or electronic tip jar machines, if the sports wagering licensee is a commercial
bingo operator described under § 9–1E–06(a)(2) of this subtitle; or
(vii) subject to subsection (e) of this section, at the facility identified
in the application approved by the Sports Wagering Application Review Commission, if the
sports wagering licensee is a holder of a Class B–1 or B–2 sports wagering facility license;
or
(2) on a self–service kiosk, device, or machine, approved by the
Commission, located in a facility or at a location identified under item (1) of this subsection.
(b) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, A mobile
sports wagering licensee may accept wagers on sporting events that are made through
online sports wagering by an individual physically located in the State.
(F) (1) SUBJECT TO § 9–1E–09.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A SPORTS WAGERING
FACILITY LICENSEE MAY ACCEPT WAGERS ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES THAT ARE
MADE BY AN INDIVIDUAL PHYSICALLY PRESENT:
(I) AT A VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY, IF THE SPORTS WAGERING
LICENSEE IS THE HOLDER OF A CLASS A–1 OR A–2 SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY
LICENSE UNDER § 9–1E–06(A)(1)(I) OR (II) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) AT A THOROUGHBRED OR STANDARDBRED RACE COURSE, IF
THE SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE IS THE HOLDER OF A CLASS A–2 SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 9–1E–06(A)(1)(II) OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(III) AT THE MARYLAND STATE FAIRGROUNDS IN TIMONIUM, IF
THE SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE IS THE HOLDER OF A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE
STATE RACING COMMISSION UNDER § 11–524 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION
ARTICLE, OR A SUBSIDIARY OF THE LICENSE HOLDER; OR

SENATE BILL 639 7
(IV) AT A SATELLITE SIMULCAST FACILITY, IF THE SPORTS
WAGERING LICENSEE IS THE OWNER OR LESSEE OF A SATELLITE SIMULCAST
FACILITY DESCRIBED UNDER § 9–1E–06(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE THAT IS NOT
DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION OR A MOBILE SPORTS
WAGERING LICENSEE MAY NOT ACCEPT WAGERS ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES.
9–1E–09.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MINUS POOL” MEANS A MUTUEL POOL IN WHICH THE AMOUNT
OF MONEY TO BE DISTRIBUTED ON WINNING WAGERS EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT OF
MONEY CONTAINED IN THAT MUTUEL POOL.
(3) “MUTUEL POOL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(4) “PARI–MUTUEL BETTING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101
OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY
LICENSEE AUTHORIZED TO OFFER SPORTS WAGERING ON HISTORICAL HORSE
RACING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1E–09 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) SPORTS WAGERING ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES:
(1) SHALL BE CONDUCTED AS PARI–MUTUEL BETTING; AND
(2) MAY BE CONDUCTED ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES OF ANY
BREED.
(D) (1) SPORTS WAGERING ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES MAY BE
PERMITTED ONLY IN A DESIGNATED AREA ON THE PREMISES OF THE SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE THAT IS APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE SHALL POST IN CONSPICUOUS PLACES IN
THE DESIGNATED AREA A GENERAL EXPLANATION OF PARI–MUTUEL BETTING
OFFERED ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES AND AN EXPLANATION OF EACH
PARI–MUTUEL POOL OFFERED.

SENATE BILL 639
(II) THE SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE SHALL SUBMIT
THE EXPLANATION TO THE COMMISSION FOR APPROVAL BEFORE POSTING THE
EXPLANATION.
(E) A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE MAY CONDUCT WAGERING ON
HISTORICAL HORSE RACES ONLY ON THE DAYS AND HOURS APPROVED BY THE
COMMISSION.
(F) BEFORE OFFERING WAGERING ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES, A SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE SHALL FIRST OBTAIN THE COMMISSION’S WRITTEN
APPROVAL OF ALL TYPES OF WAGERS OFFERED.
(G) (1) (I) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY WAGER ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES
ONLY ON A TERMINAL APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION.
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE THE TOTAL NUMBER OF TERMINALS THAT MAY
BE AVAILABLE AT THE SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY.
(III) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT AUTHORIZE THE OPERATION OF
MORE THAN 4,000 TERMINALS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) APPROXIMATE ODDS OR PAYOUTS FOR EACH PARI–MUTUEL POOL
SHALL BE POSTED OR MADE AVAILABLE ON EACH TERMINAL FOR VIEWING BY
INDIVIDUAL BETTORS.
(3) ONCE A BETTOR DEPOSITS AN AMOUNT IN THE TERMINAL
OFFERING WAGERING ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES, ONE OR MORE HISTORICAL
HORSE RACES SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE FOR WAGERING.
(4) BEFORE THE BETTOR MAKES ANY WAGER SELECTIONS, THE
TERMINAL MAY NOT DISPLAY ANY INFORMATION THAT WOULD ALLOW THE BETTOR
TO IDENTIFY THE HISTORICAL HORSE RACE OR RACES ON WHICH THE BETTOR IS
WAGERING, INCLUDING THE LOCATION OF THE RACE OR RACES, THE DATE ON
WHICH THE RACE OR RACES WERE RUN, THE NAMES OF THE HORSES IN THE RACE
OR RACES, OR THE NAMES OF THE JOCKEYS OR DRIVERS THAT RODE THE HORSES
IN THE RACE OR RACES.
(5) (I) THE TERMINAL SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE TRUE AND
ACCURATE PAST PERFORMANCE INFORMATION ON THE HISTORICAL HORSE RACE
TO THE BETTOR BEFORE THE BETTOR MAKES THE BETTOR’S WAGER SELECTIONS.

SENATE BILL 639 9
(II) THE INFORMATION PROVIDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE:
1. CURRENT AS OF THE DAY THE HISTORICAL HORSE
RACE WAS ACTUALLY RUN; AND
2. DISPLAYED ON THE TERMINAL IN DATA OR
GRAPHICAL FORM.
(6) (I) AFTER A BETTOR FINALIZES THE BETTOR’S WAGER
SELECTIONS, THE TERMINAL SHALL DISPLAY:
1. THE BETTOR’S SELECTIONS;
2. THE OFFICIAL RESULTS OF EACH RACE; AND
3. A REPLAY OF THE RACE OR RACES, OR A PORTION
THEREOF, WHETHER BY DIGITAL OR ANIMATED DEPICTION OR BY WAY OF A VIDEO
RECORDING.
(II) THE IDENTITY OF EACH RACE SHALL BE REVEALED TO THE
BETTOR AFTER THE BETTOR HAS PLACED THE BETTOR’S WAGER.
(H) (1) A WAGER ON A HISTORICAL HORSE RACE OR ON MULTIPLE
HISTORICAL HORSE RACES SHALL BE PLACED IN PARI–MUTUEL POOLS APPROVED
BY THE COMMISSION.
(2) A PAYOUT TO A WINNING BETTOR SHALL BE PAID FROM MONEY
WAGERED BY BETTORS AND MAY NOT CONSTITUTE A WAGER AGAINST THE SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE.
(3) A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE CONDUCTING
WAGERING ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES MAY NOT CONDUCT WAGERING IN A
MANNER THAT RESULTS IN BETTORS WAGERING AGAINST THE SPORTS WAGERING
FACILITY LICENSEE, OR IN A MANNER SO THAT THE AMOUNT RETAINED BY THE
SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE IS DEPENDENT ON THE OUTCOME OF ANY
PARTICULAR RACE OR THE SUCCESS OF ANY PARTICULAR WAGER.
(I) (1) A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY SHALL OPERATE A HISTORICAL
HORSE RACING PARI–MUTUEL POOL OR POOLS IN A MANNER AND METHOD
APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION.

SENATE BILL 639
(2) A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE OFFERING WAGERING
ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES MAY OPERATE A PLAYER–FUNDED POOL OR POOLS IN
A MANNER AND METHOD APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION FOR THE PURPOSE OF
ENSURING THAT SUFFICIENT FUNDS ARE AVAILABLE AT ALL TIMES TO PAY ANY
WINNING WAGERS IN SITUATIONS WHERE A PARI–MUTUEL POOL BECOMES A MINUS
POOL.
(3) FOR EACH WAGER MADE, A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY
LICENSEE MAY ASSIGN A PERCENTAGE OF THE WAGER TO A PLAYER–FUNDED POOL
OR POOLS.
(J) (1) THE MINIMUM WAGER THAT A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY
LICENSEE MAY ACCEPT ON A WAGER BASED ON THE OUTCOME OF A HISTORICAL
HORSE RACE OR RACES IS 10 CENTS.
(2) THE MINIMUM PAYOUT ON ANY WAGER MAY NOT BE LESS THAN
THE AMOUNT WAGERED.
9–1E–12.
(a) [(1)] The Commission shall account to the Comptroller for all of the revenue
under this subtitle.
[(2)] (B) (1) The proceeds from sports wagering ON ANY SPORTING
EVENT OTHER THAN HISTORICAL HORSE RACES, less the amount retained by the
licensee under [subsection (b)(1) of this section] PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
shall be under the control of the Comptroller and distributed as provided under
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS subsection [(b) of this section].
[(b) (1)] (2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of
this paragraph, all proceeds from sports wagering shall be electronically transferred
monthly into the State Lottery Fund established under Subtitle 1 of this title.
(ii) A Class A–1 and A–2 sports wagering facility licensee shall
retain 85% of the proceeds from sports wagering conducted at the locations described in §
9–1E–09(a) of this subtitle.
(iii) A Class B–1 and B–2 sports wagering facility licensee shall
retain 85% of the proceeds from sports wagering conducted at the location described in the
licensee’s application.
(iv) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall retain 80% of the
proceeds from online sports wagering received by the licensee.

SENATE BILL 639 11
[(2)] (3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
all proceeds from sports wagering in the State Lottery Fund established under Subtitle 1
of this title shall be distributed on a monthly basis, on a properly approved transmittal
prepared by the Commission to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established
under § 5–206 of the Education Article.
(ii) For fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, 5% of the
proceeds attributable to mobile sports wagering shall be deposited in the General Fund.
(c) (1) THE PROCEEDS FROM SPORTS WAGERING ON HISTORICAL HORSE
RACES, LESS THE AMOUNT RETAINED BY THE LICENSEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, SHALL BE UNDER THE CONTROL OF THE COMPTROLLER AND
DISTRIBUTED AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, ALL PROCEEDS FROM SPORTS WAGERING ON HISTORICAL HORSE
RACES SHALL BE TRANSFERRED ELECTRONICALLY MONTHLY INTO THE STATE
LOTTERY FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.
(II) IF THE SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE IS A VIDEO
LOTTERY OPERATOR, THE SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE SHALL RETAIN
THE SAME PERCENTAGE OF THE PROCEEDS FROM HISTORICAL HORSE RACES THAT
THE VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR RETAINS FROM PROCEEDS FROM VIDEO LOTTERY
TERMINALS UNDER § 9–1A–27(A)(2), (7), AND (8), (B), AND (C)(1)(II) AND (2) OF THIS
TITLE.
(III) A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE THAT IS NOT A
VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR SHALL RETAIN 60% OF THE PROCEEDS FROM
HISTORICAL HORSE RACES WAGERS AT THE SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY.
(3) ON A MONTHLY BASIS, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE
THE PROCEEDS FROM SPORTS WAGERING ON HISTORICAL HORSE RACES IN THE
STATE LOTTERY FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE IN THE
FOLLOWING MANNER:
(I) THE SAME PERCENTAGE OF PROCEEDS SHALL BE
DISTRIBUTED AS LOCAL IMPACT GRANTS AND TO THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING
CONTROL AGENCY, THE PURSE DEDICATION ACCOUNT, AND THE SMALL,
MINORITY, AND WOMEN–OWNED BUSINESSES ACCOUNT IN THE SAME MANNER AS
PROCEEDS FROM VIDEO LOTTERY TERMINALS UNDER § 9–1A–27 OF THIS TITLE;
(II) 5% OF THE PROCEEDS SHALL BE DEPOSITED IN THE
GENERAL FUND; AND

SENATE BILL 639
(III) THE REMAINDER OF THE PROCEEDS SHALL BE
DISTRIBUTED TO THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 5–206 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(D) A winning wager on a sporting event that is not claimed by the winner within
182 days after the wager is won shall:
(1) become the property of the State; and
(2) be distributed to the Problem Gambling Fund established under §
9–1A–33 of this title.
[(d)] (E) If a sports wagering licensee returns to successful players more than
the amount of money wagered in any month, the licensee may subtract that amount from
the proceeds of up to the three following months.
[(e)] (F) The admissions and amusement tax may not be imposed on any
proceeds from sports wagering.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That before this Act, which
authorizes additional forms or expansion of commercial gaming, becomes effective, it first
shall be submitted to a referendum of the qualified voters of the State at the general
election to be held in November 2026, in accordance with Article XIX, § 1(e) of the Maryland
Constitution. The State Board of Elections shall do those things necessary and proper to
provide for and hold the referendum required by this section. If a majority of the votes cast
on the question are “For the referred law”, this Act shall become effective on January 1,
2027, but if a majority of the votes cast on the question are “Against the referred law”, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act and for the sole purpose of providing for the referendum required by Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.